Nebraska, session 109, LB40.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB40 LB40
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 21-193, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
21-193 (1) Notice of organization, amendment of the certificate of
organization, merger, conversion, or domestication must be published for
three successive weeks in a some legal newspaper of general circulation
near the designated office of the limited liability company. A notice of
organization must show the information required by subsection (b) of
section 21-117 to be stated in the certificate of organization. A brief
resume of any amendment of the certificate of organization or of any
merger, conversion, or domestication of the limited liability company
shall be published in the same manner and for the same period of time as
notice of organization is required to be published.
(2) Whenever a any limited liability company is voluntarily
dissolved, notice of the dissolution shall be published as required by
section 21-150.
(3) Proof of publication of any of the notices shall be filed in the
office of the Secretary of State. In the event any notice described in
subsection (1) of this section and required to be given pursuant to this
section is not given, but is subsequently published for the required
time, and proof of the publication thereof is filed in the office of the
Secretary of State, the acts of the limited liability company prior to,
as well as after, such publication shall be valid.
Sec. 2. Original section 21-193, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-